Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 5

Teenage Pregnancy

37-3-501. Informational clearinghouse — Toll-free telephone service for inquiries — Promotional activities — Annual report.

There shall be created, within the Nashville office of the department of health, the Tennessee informational clearinghouse on teenage pregnancy.

The department shall obtain and operate a toll-free telephone line for the express purpose of receiving and encouraging inquiries for informational services. The department shall assist callers by providing informational services needed to plan programs and presentations, to organize teen pregnancy prevention activities, to organize parenting education and assistance programs for teen parents, and to undertake other activities and programs to address problems associated with teenage pregnancy.

The department shall regularly undertake appropriate activities to inform and remind the citizens of this state of the services provided by the clearinghouse and of the availability of the toll-free telephone line. Such promotional activities shall regularly include, but not necessarily be limited to, press releases, posters, speeches, and public service announcements on radio and television. The department shall undertake special activities to improve public awareness of the clearinghouse within those counties and areas of the state in which teenage pregnancy rates are highest.

In preparing for and responding to requests for information collected and maintained within the clearinghouse, the department shall provide a level of service that is at least comparable to the level of service so provided by the children's services commission prior to July 1, 1988.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment]

Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1988, ch. 1005, §§ 1, 7, 8; 1988, ch. 1011, § 5; 1988, ch. 1012, § 4; 1988, ch. 1021, § 3; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(m); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2015, ch. 212, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Teen Pregnancy Information Clearinghouse serves as a central source of information on teen pregnancy statistics, resource materials, and services. Also available is information on teen pregnancy programs in the state and upcoming conferences and workshops. The toll-free telephone number, within Tennessee only, is 877-461-8277.

Acts 1988, ch. 1005, § 7 provided that all information collected and maintained within the Tennessee informational clearinghouse by the children's services commission prior to July 1, 1988, shall be transferred to the Tennessee informational clearinghouse within the department of health and environment (now department of health).

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (e) which read, “The department of health and each department of state government that administers services to children and families shall jointly report at least once annually, on or before December 31, to the judiciary committee of the senate and the civil justice committee of the house of representatives concerning administration of the Tennessee informational clearinghouse on teenage pregnancy.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 212, § 3. April 20, 2015.

Cross-References. Project RAP, title 71, ch. 3, part 7.

Tennessee resource mothers program, title 68, ch. 1, part 14.

Collateral References.

Propriety of prophylactic availability programs. 52 A.L.R.5th 477.

37-3-502. Information on programs and services — Bibliography of resources.

The department shall collect and maintain, within the clearinghouse, current information on publicly and privately supported programs and services within the state that address problems associated with teenage pregnancy. Each such program or service shall be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities: family life education; prevention of teenage pregnancy; counseling services for teenagers who are, or who may think they are, pregnant; prenatal care for teenage mothers; parenting skills education for teenagers; job training and placement for teenage parents; and educational or other support services for teenage parents. For each such program or service, the clearinghouse shall maintain the following information: a description of the program or service, the principal address of such program or service, general eligibility criteria for participation therein, funding sources, the name and telephone of a knowledgeable contact person, and such other information as would be useful to a person or organization in deciding whether to utilize or emulate the program or service.

The department shall also collect and maintain, within the clearinghouse, a current bibliography of books, abstracts, articles, films and other informational resources on the problems associated with teenage pregnancy and methods and techniques for effectively addressing such problems. In selecting items to be included within such bibliography, the commission shall strive to include only such items as are academically reliable and as are likely to prove beneficial to a person or organization wishing to address one (1) or more of the problems associated with teenage pregnancy.

Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1988, ch. 1005, § 2.

Cross-References. Coordination of services, §68-1-1405.

Model programs for adolescents at risk, §37-5-125.

37-3-503. Statistical and other research information — State reports.

The department shall also collect and maintain, within the clearinghouse, statistical and other research information concerning teenage pregnancy, and related problems, in the state as a whole and in its cities, counties and regions.

Furthermore, copies of all Tennessee state government reports concerning teenage pregnancy and related problems shall be available, at cost, through the clearinghouse.

Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1988, ch. 1005, § 3.

37-3-504. Information concerning conferences, workshops, hearings, meetings.

The department shall also collect and maintain, within the clearinghouse, pertinent information on pending conferences, workshops, public hearings and other meetings concerning teenage pregnancy and related problems.

Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1988, ch. 1005, § 4.

37-3-505. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former §37-3-505 (Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 5), concerning assistance in gathering information and furnishing speakers, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

37-3-506. Similar programs or services operating within state.

To the extent that, during the course of implementing this part, it comes to the attention of the commission that two (2) or more significantly similar programs or services are being operated within the state, the commission shall ensure that the persons or organizations administering such programs and services are so informed.

Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1.

37-3-507. Purpose of informational clearinghouse.

The Tennessee informational clearinghouse on teenage pregnancy is created strictly for the purpose of providing the people of this state with an accurate, accessible, and centralized repository of information concerning teenage pregnancy and related problems as well as available programs and services.

Nothing contained within this part shall be construed as authorizing or requiring the commission or the clearinghouse to certify or otherwise attest to the quality of any program or service for which it maintains information.

The clearinghouse shall not provide, and shall not be used for, counseling services.

Acts 1987, ch. 441, § 1.

37-3-508 — 37-3-520. [Reserved.]

The executive director of the commission on children and youth, and the commissioners of education, labor and workforce development, health, and children's services shall jointly develop and administer a plan to ensure that every teen parent, participating in the assistance programs or services of the departments, receives appropriate information concerning the potential benefits to be realized from delaying a second or subsequent pregnancy and to further ensure that such teen parent receives appropriate referral information if assistance is desired in postponing a second or subsequent pregnancy.

To the maximum extent reasonably possible, such informational services shall be provided by existing personnel and within existing resources.

The plan shall target, at a minimum:

Teen parents receiving homebound instruction pursuant to § 49-10-1101;

Teen parents receiving aid to families with dependent children pursuant to title 71, chapter 3, part 1;

Teen parents receiving medical assistance for themselves or their children pursuant to title 71, chapter 5, parts 1 and 2;

Teen parents receiving food stamp assistance pursuant to title 71, chapter 5, part 3; and

Teen parents receiving federally funded training and assistance administered through the Tennessee department of labor and workforce development.

The plan shall target other teens who are participating in the assistance programs or services of the departments and who are highly at risk of becoming first time teen parents. The plan may also target other teens who are highly at risk of becoming first time teen parents.

Acts 1987, ch. 442, § 1; 1988, ch. 960, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 961, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 1999, ch. 520, § 37.

Cross-References. Program of support and assistance for family life education, §49-1-205.